Donald Trump|Speech: Donald Trump in Fairfield, CT|August 13, 2016

Q Wow, thank you. Thank you. Thank You, Connecticut. Great people, thank. Thank You, Connecticut. Great people, thank. Thank You, Connecticut. Great people. Thank you. Thank you. Something big is happening, folks is something big is happening, folks is something big is happening, folks is something big happen, something big happen, something big happen something back.
You know, you think this something back, you know, you think this something back, you know, you think this is bad you want to go outside, you have is bad, you want to go outside, you have is bad, you want to go outside, you have thousands and thousands Of people would thousands and thousands of people would thousands and thousands of people would anybody like to volunteer to give anybody like to volunteer to give anybody like to volunteer to give somebody outside your place?
Yes, somebody outside your place, yes, somebody outside your place, yes, I'm shocked. Look, I love Connecticut, I've I'm shocked. Look, I love Connecticut, I've I'm shocked. Look, I love Connecticut. I've lived in Connecticut. I have so many lived in Connecticut. I have so many lived in Connecticut. I have so many friends in Connecticut, how did you lose friends in Connecticut?
How did you lose friends in Connecticut? How did you lose General Electric? How did you lose General Electric? How did you lose General Electric? How did you lose General Allen bad governor, you got a bad General Allen bad governor, you got a bad General Allen bad governor, you got a bad governor, any governor that would lose governor, any governor that would lose governor, any governor that would lose General Electric hasn't Done his job, let General Electric hasn't done his job.
Let General Electric hasn't done his job. Let me tell you bad government, you know me tell you bad government, you know me tell you bad government, you know, before we begin, I just want to say that before we begin, I just want to say that before we begin, I just want to say that It's my honor. I've always loved this, it's my honor.
I've always loved this. It's my honor. I've always loved this part of the world. I've always loved this part of the world. I've always loved this part of the world. I've always loved this state. Many years lived in Connecticut if state many years lived in Connecticut if state many years lived in Connecticut, if they get the taxes down, I'll come back, they get the taxes down.
I'll come back, they get the taxes down. I'll come back immediately, okay, I'll come back. Believe immediately, okay, I'll come back believe immediately. Okay, I'll come back. Believe me, but you know, I was called a month ago, me, but you know, I was called a month ago, me, but you know, I was called a month ago by make-a-wish.
We all know make-a-wish by make-a-wish. We all know make-a-wish by make-a-wish. We all know make-a-wish an unbelievable outfit, great, great, an unbelievable outfit, great, great, an unbelievable outfit, great, great people, right? They're great people and people, right? They're great people and people, right?
They're great people and they said there's a young man who wasn't - they said there's a young man who wasn't - they said there's a young man who wasn't feeling the best and he wanted to meet feeling the best and he wanted to meet feeling the best. And he wanted to meet Donald Trump. Now that's a problem.
Donald Trump now that's a problem. Donald Trump now that's a problem because he's really, really smart, but in because he's really, really smart, but in because he's really, really smart. But in this case, maybe he could have done this case, maybe he could have done this case, maybe he could have done better, right, better, right, better, right?
But his wish was to meet Donald Trump. But his wish was to meet Donald Trump. But his wish was to meet Donald Trump and we set it up and I said you know, and we set it up and I said you know, and we set it up and I said you know what, let's do it. They live in Fairfield. What let's do it, they live in Fairfield, what, let's do it.
They live in Fairfield. I said I said I said I'm gonna be up in Connecticut. You know, I'm gonna be up in Connecticut. You know, I'm gonna be up in Connecticut. You know, we're making a big move for the state of - we're making a big move for the state of - we're making a big move for the state of Connecticut just so you understand normally normally that wouldn't happen normally.
Normally that wouldn't happen normally. Normally that wouldn't happen because the Republican, in theory doesn't because the Republican in theory doesn't because the Republican in theory doesn't win Connecticut all that we have the win Connecticut all that we have the win Connecticut all that we have the head of the Republican Party here Right, head of the Republican Party here, right, head of the Republican Party here right here, right there, good man.
But we're here right there, good man. But we're here right there, good man. But we're gonna put a heavy move because look, your gonna put a heavy move because look, your gonna put a heavy move because look, your taxes are through the roof too high. I'm taxes are through the roof too high. I'm taxes are through the roof too high.
I'm gonna read some statistics to you. You're gonna read some statistics to you. You're gonna read some statistics to you. You're not gonna believe it, but before I want not gonna believe it. But before I want not gonna believe it, but before I want to do that, Giacomo Brancato 18 years old to do that, Giacomo Brancato 18 years old to do that, Giacomo Brancato 18 years old, he looks like a movie star.
He looks like a movie star. He looks like a movie star, I said Giacomo, you feelin great and he's - I said Giacomo, you feelin great and he's - I said Giacomo, you feelin great and he's in remission. He is an unbelievable young in remission. He is an unbelievable young in remission. He is an unbelievable young man.
I just was with him backstage. So I man I just was with him backstage. So I man I just was with him backstage. So I want to bring Giacomo up with his family, want to bring Giacomo up with his family, want to bring Giacomo up with his family, the Brancato family and give him a big the Brancato family and give him a big the Brancato family and give him a Big hand, hand hand.
So I said, if I introduce you Giacomo, so I said, if I introduce you Giacomo, so I said if I introduce you Giacomo with all those cameras, look at those with all those cameras, look at those with all those cameras, look at those cameras, they're the worst Human beings cameras, they're the worst human beings cameras, they're the worst human beings in the world in the world, in the world, but the worst, not worst.
But I said if I - the worst, not worst, but I said if I - the worst, not worst. But I said, if I introduce you with all these cameras, you introduce you with all these cameras, you introduce you with all these cameras you with that look will end up being a movie with that look will end up being a movie.
With that look will end up being a movie star, this family is gonna be a whole star. This family is gonna be a whole star. This family is gonna be a whole group of movie stars. Look at the family group of movie stars. Look at the family group of movie stars, look at the family Giacomo say a couple of words to this.
Giacomo say a couple of words to this. Giacomo say a couple of words to this wonderful group. My friends report. Hi everyone. Some of you probably know a hi, everyone, some of you probably know a hi, everyone, some of you probably know a name, name name Jockamo and I'm a big supporter of shrum Jockamo and I'm a big supporter of shrum Jockamo and I'm a big supporter of shrum.
Just everyone vote for Trump make just everyone vote for Trump make just everyone vote for Trump make America great again, America, great. Again, America great. Again, she doesn't want to leave the stage you, she doesn't want to leave the stage you. She doesn't want to leave the stage you see all right, Giacomo, I want 10 % of see.
All right, Giacomo, I want 10 % of see. All right, Giacomo, I want 10 % of everything you make. I want 10 % right. So everything you make, I want 10 % right. So everything you make, I want 10 % right. So we have a big election coming up. Never. We have a big election coming up, never. We have a big election coming up, never more important than this one more important than this one more important than this one, we have Supreme Court justices and it.
We have Supreme Court justices and it. We have Supreme Court justices and it could be a record number. Appointed by could be a record number appointed by - could be a record number appointed by the next president and could be a record the next president and could be a record the next president and could be a record number.
It's probably going to be three number. It's probably going to be three number, it's probably going to be three. We already have one judge Scalia Justice. We already have one judge, Scalia Justice. We already have one judge, Scalia Justice, Scalia passed away wasn't expected, Scalia passed away, wasn't expected.
Scalia passed away wasn't expected. That's what happens, wasn't expected. We - that's what happens, wasn't expected. We - that's what happens, wasn't expected. We could have as many as four, maybe even could have as many as four, maybe even could have as many as four, maybe even five if Hillary Clinton crooked Hillary.
Five. If Hillary Clinton crooked Hillary five, if Hillary Clinton crooked, Hillary, terrible, you know what we're saying, terrible, you know what, we're saying, terrible, you know what we're saying, right, folks, you know what we're saying, right, folks, you know what we're saying, right, folks, you know what we're Saying by the way, 33,000 missing emails, think by the way, 33,000 missing emails, think by the way, 33,000 missing emails, think of it 33,000. Now she said that it was of it 33,000. Now she said that it was of it 33,000. Now she said that it was for the wedding Chelsea's wedding for the wedding Chelsea's wedding for the wedding Chelsea's wedding.
I give that five or maybe ten and she - I give that five or maybe ten and she I give that five or maybe ten and she said yoga classes, right. I give that to said yoga classes, right. I give that to said yoga classes, right. I give that to what happened to the rest and now you what happened to the rest and now you what happened to the rest and now you see they're coming out galore, see they're coming out galore, see they're coming out galore now.
They had a thousand come out and now they had a thousand come out and now they had a thousand come out and they had a couple of more come out and they had a couple of more come out and they had a couple of more come out. And now it's finding out that it's now - it's finding out that it's now it's finding out that it's pay-for-play, which is illegal, a hundred pay-for-play, which is illegal, a hundred pay-for-play, which is illegal, a hundred percent illegal percent, illegal percent.
Illegal. I used to say just a couple of weeks ago, I used to say just a couple of weeks ago, I used to say just a couple of weeks ago, let's just beat her on November 8th, but let's just beat her on November 8th. But let's just beat her on November 8th, but you know what, you have a point, you have a point, so the press is you have a point.
So the press is you have a point. So the press is protecting her, the press is totally protecting her. Do the press is totally protecting her, do the press is totally protecting her? Do you ever notice she comes out, reads his, you ever notice, she comes out, reads his, you ever notice. She comes out, reads his speech and then goes away for a little speech and then goes away for a little speech and then goes away for a little while, no press conference and what 255, while no press conference and what 255, while no press conference and what 255 days or something like that, days or something like that, days or something like that, no press conference and when she had no press conference and when she had no press conference and when she had like a friendly group of people asking like a friendly group of People asking like a friendly group of people asking her questions that didn't work out too her questions that didn't work out too her questions that didn't work out too well that didn't work out too well.
And well that didn't work out too well. And well, that didn't work out too well and when she said it was short circuited I when she said it was short circuited I when she said it was short circuited, I saw that I said, you know that's going to saw that. I said, you know, that's going to saw that I said, you know, that's going to be a disaster.
What she just said is a be a disaster. What she just said is a be a disaster. What she just said is a disaster that's going to be headlines disaster that's going to be headlines disaster that's going to be headlines tomorrow and the dishonest newspapers tomorrow and the dishonest newspapers tomorrow and the dishonest newspapers and lo and behold, it wasn't.
And then - and lo and behold, it wasn't and then - and lo and behold, it wasn't. And then again, it wasn't and it wasn't. And we again, it wasn't and it wasn't. And we - again, it wasn't and it wasn't and we bring it up. Can you imagine if Donald bring it up, can you imagine if Donald bring it up, can you imagine if Donald Trump said I was short circuited up here, Trump said I was short circuited up here.
Trump said I was short circuited up here. This would have gone on for years this this would have gone on for years this this would have gone on for years. This would have gone on, I would have been would have gone on, I would have been would have gone on. I would have been given probably a death sentence probably given probably a death sentence, probably given probably a death sentence, probably they would have reinvented the electric, they would have reinvented the electric, they would have reinvented the electric chair right now.
It's very unfair. I'll chair right now. It's very unfair. I'll chair right now. It's very unfair. I'll tell you honestly, I'm not running tell you honestly, I'm not running tell you honestly, I'm not running against crooked, Hillary, but I'm running against crooked, Hillary, but I'm running against crooked, Hillary.
But I'm running against the crooked media, that's what I - against the crooked media, that's what I - against the crooked media, that's what I want. I'm not running against want, I'm not running against want. I'm not running against true true. You know true. We're all true true. You know, true, we're all true, true, you know, true, we're all running, you know, we're together, we're running, you know, we're together, we're running, you know, we're together, we're together.
We have something that's going together. We have something that's going together. We have something that's going on. That's unbelievable, get him out, get on, that's unbelievable, get him out, get on, that's unbelievable, get him out, get him out, get him out of here, get him out him out, get him out of here, get him out him out, get him out of here, get him Out of here, all right, we have a movement of here, all right.
We have a movement of here, all right. We have a movement going on. Look at this as an example, you going on. Look at this as an example, you going on - look at this as an example, you have a room that set every record, have a room that set every record, have a room that set every record tonight. By the way, it's been around for tonight.
By the way, it's been around for tonight, by the way, it's been around for a while. We put some loudspeakers outside a while. We put some loudspeakers outside a while. We put some loudspeakers outside. You have even more people outside than you have even more people outside than you have even more people outside than you have inside.
It's a Saturday night in Connecticut. You do have other things to do. I know you do have other things to do. I know you do have other things to do, I know that, but what's better than being at a that but what's better than being at a that but what's better than being at a trump rally right? Make America great trump rally right, make America great trump rally right, make America great, again, make America clean.
So again make America clean. So again make America clean. So every time I go home, my wife said, I saw every time I go home, my wife said, I saw every time I go home, my wife said, I saw you in television, how was the crowd they you in television, how was the crowd they you in Television, how was the crowd?
They never showed the crowd, they don't want, never showed the crowd, they don't want, never showed the crowd, they don't want to show the crowd. They don't want to, to show the crowd, they don't want to, to show the crowd. They don't want to show - I was in Pennsylvania yesterday, we had - I was in Pennsylvania yesterday, we had - I was in Pennsylvania yesterday, we had crowds that were so massive, same thing crowds that were so massive, same thing, crowds that were so massive, same thing turning away Thousands and thousands of turning away thousands and thousands of turning away thousands and thousands of people, people that want jobs, hey, look, we people people that want jobs, hey, look, we people people that want jobs, hey, look, we have people in this room, amazing people have people In this room, amazing people have people in this room, amazing people.
We have amazed. We have everybody we have. We have amazed, we have everybody we have. We have amazed, we have everybody, we have amazing people. We have some people in amazing people. We have some people in amazing people. We have some people in this room that made more money 18 years, this room that made more money 18 years, this room that made more money 18 years ago in real wages than they're making ago in real wages than they're making ago in real wages than they're Making today and today they're working two jobs today and today they're working two jobs today and today they're working two jobs, not you, right, not you.
Yes, sorry, they're not you right, not you. Yes, sorry, they're not you right, not you. Yes, sorry. They're working harder. They're older, you know, working harder, they're older, you know, working harder, they're older, you know, it's supposed to be the other way around. It's supposed to be the other way around.
It's supposed to be the other way around. We are going to bring jobs back to our - we are going to bring jobs back to our - we are going to bring jobs back to our country country country fast, fast. We are not going to allow our fast fast. We are not going to allow our fast fast. We are not going to allow our companies to move to Mexico and other companies to move to Mexico and other companies to move to Mexico and other places fire.
Everybody hire people from places, fire, everybody, hire people from places, fire, everybody, hire people from other countries, make a product, sell it, other countries, make a product, sell it, other countries make a product, sell it into the United States and there is no into the United States. And there is no into the United States and there is no retribution, let me tell you something retribution, let me tell you something retribution, let me tell you something.
Folks, we are going to change. Yeah, we're folks, we are going to change. Yeah, we're - folks we are going to change, yeah, we're going to build the wall, don't worry going to build the wall, don't worry going to build the wall, don't worry about it about it, about it. We're gonna build them wrong. We're gonna, we're gonna build them wrong.
We're gonna, we're gonna build them wrong. We're gonna build a wall, we're gonna build the wall, build the, we're gonna build the wall, build the, we're gonna build the wall, build the wall and ready. I'd ready. I think you've wall and ready. I'd ready. I think you've wall and ready. I'd ready, I think you've heard this and by the way, this is 100 % heard this.
And by the way, this is 100 % heard this. And by the way, this is 100 % certain, okay, certain, okay, certain, okay, I'm telling this to Giacomo, I might lie. I'm telling this to Giacomo, I might lie, I'm telling this to Giacomo, I might lie to you like Hillary does all the time to you, like Hillary does all the time to you, like Hillary does all the time.
But I'll never lie to Giacomo, okay? But I'll never lie to Giacomo, okay, but I'll never lie to Giacomo. Okay, alright, Giacomo, you hold me to it. We're alright, Giacomo, you hold me to it. We're alright, Giacomo, you hold me to it. We're gonna build the wall but who, who, who is gonna build the wall but who, who, who is gonna build the wall but who, who, who is gonna pay for the wall, all right?
Gon na pay for the wall, all right? Gon na pay for the wall, all right. Giacomo hurt me, don't worry about it. I'm Giacomo hurt me, don't worry about it. I'm Giacomo hurt me, don't worry about it. I'm not nervous. Yeah, come - oh, you're not, not nervous, yeah, come - oh, you're not, not nervous. Yeah.
Come, oh, you're not gonna have any problem. So these gonna have any problem. So these gonna have any problem. So these politicians come up to me, you know, we politicians come up to me. You know, we politicians come up to me. You know, we had the debates and I know all the - had the debates and I know all the - had the debates and I know all the politicians I used to be establishment.
I politicians I used to be establishment. I politicians I used to be establishment. I used to give millions of dollars to used to give millions of dollars to used to give millions of dollars to politicians who knows the system, better. Politicians who knows the system, better politicians who knows the system better than me.
Believe me, I know the system and than me, believe me, I know the system and than me, believe me, I know the system and then one day I said, maybe I'll run and then one day I said, maybe I'll run and then one day I said, maybe I'll run and they all said no, no, no, don't run, don't they all said? No, no, no!
Don't run, don't they all said? No, no, no! Don't run, don't run the politicians all said, don't run run. The politicians all said don't run run the politicians all said, don't run. We love you, Donald, don't run. I was an - we love you, Donald, don't run. I was an - we love you, Donald, don't run. I was an insider, I went from being an insider to insider.
I went from being an insider to insider. I went from being an insider to an outsider in about two seconds and and I ran and I was told that this is and I ran and I was told that this is and I ran and I was told that this is the most talented field in The history, the most talented field in the history, the most talented field in the history of Republican politics and here we are of Republican politics and here we are of Republican politics and here we are folks here.
We are folks here. We are folks here. We are and a lot of politicians would come up and a lot of politicians would come up and a lot of politicians would come up to me. And they used to say Donal I can to me and they used to say Donal I can to me. And they used to say Donal, I can understand strong borders.
So we have to understand strong borders. So we have to understand strong borders. So we have to have strong, but it's - you remember in have strong, but it's - you remember in have strong, but it's - you remember in June 16th, I talked about illegal June 16th. I talked about illegal June 16th. I talked about illegal immigration, right, illegal immigration, immigration, right, illegal immigration, immigration, right illegal immigration, the Border Patrol agents 16,500 endorsed the Border Patrol agents, 16,500 endorsed the Border Patrol agents, 16,500 endorsed me Sheriff, Joe sheriffs, your pyro me Sheriff, Joe sheriffs, your pyro me Sheriff.
Joe sheriffs your pyro endorsement that tells you Sheriff endorsement that tells you Sheriff endorsement that tells you Sheriff. And by the way, the fact that it's about - and by the way, the fact that it's about - and by the way, the fact that it's about a hundred and ninety degrees in this a hundred and ninety degrees in this a hundred.
And ninety degrees in this room makes me appreciate the people of room, makes me appreciate the people of room, makes me appreciate the people of Connecticut even more. So man, it's great, but I love it. It's like a - it's great, but I love it. It's like a - it's great, but I love it. It's like a workout.
You go home, you lose five pounds workout, you go home, you lose five pounds workout, you go home, you lose five pounds. I say what happened, it's like it's like I say what happened. It's like - it's - like I say, what happened, it's like - it's like a sweat suit I'm wearing, but you guys a sweat suit I'm wearing, but you guys a sweat suit I'm wearing.
But you guys have been here for hours. You've been - have been here for hours. You've been - have been here for hours, you've been here for three, four hours, how the hell here for three, four hours, how the hell here for three, four hours, how the hell do you do that? How did you do it? These are amazing people.
So here's the - these are amazing people. So here's the - these are amazing people. So here's the story folks. So the politicians, they said story folks. So the politicians, they said story folks. So the politicians, they said to me very strongly, I don't worry about to me very strongly. I don't worry about to me very strongly.
I don't worry about them. Don't worry, I'll look the cameras, them, don't worry, I'll look the cameras, them, don't worry. I'll look. The cameras in turn, in turn, in turn the cameras in turn, Wow! Oh! That's great. The cameras in turn, Wow! Oh! That's great. The cameras in turn, Wow! Oh, that's great.
Those cameras never ever turn unless is those cameras never ever turn unless is those cameras never ever turn unless is the protestor because see a protester is the protestor because see a protester is the protestor because see a protester is considered a bad thing for Trump. Oh! He considered a bad thing for Trump, oh, he considered a bad thing for Trump, oh, he had a protester.
So I didn't think they had a protester. So I didn't think they had a protester. So I didn't think they could turn. But when there's a protester could turn, but when there's a protester could turn. But when there's a protester, they're like pretzels, they can turn. They're like pretzels, they can turn. They're like pretzels, they can turn Giacomo, they can turn like pretzels.
Look, Giacomo, they can turn like pretzels, look, Giacomo, they can turn like pretzels. Look, I did you believe that all the cameras I did you believe that all the cameras I did you believe that all the cameras were turned on. What a bunch I'll tell were turned on what a bunch I'll tell were turned on what a bunch.
I'll tell you in particular lately we have a - you in particular lately we have a - you in particular lately we have a newspaper that's failing badly, it's newspaper that's failing badly, it's newspaper that's failing badly. It's losing a lot of money. It's gonna be out losing a lot of money. It's gonna be out losing a lot of money.
It's gonna be out of business very soon of business, very soon of business very soon. The New York Times, okay, I love it the New York Times. Okay, I love it the New York Times, okay, I love it and they wrote a story today anonymous and they wrote a story today anonymous and they wrote a story today. Anonymous sources have said three anonymous sources.
Have said three anonymous sources have said three anonymous sources, anonymous is synonymous that sources anonymous is synonymous that sources anonymous is synonymous that they don't use names. I don't really - they don't use names. I don't really - they don't use names. I don't really think they have any names, okay, but think they have any names, okay, but think they have any names, okay.
But anonymous sources have said there are no anonymous sources. Have said there are no anonymous sources. Have said there are no anonymous. You know with my campaign, I'll anonymous you know with my campaign, I'll anonymous you know with my campaign. I'll be honest with you. It's me, it's me they be honest with you.
It's me, it's me they be honest with you. It's me, it's me, they never called me, they don't call me, but never called me. They don't call me, but never called me. They don't call me. But these are the most dishonest people. The - these are the most dishonest people, the - these are the most dishonest people.
The good news is I love, you know I put down good news is I love you know I put down. Good news is I love, you know, I put down failing at New York Times the newspapers failing at New York Times the newspapers failing at New York Times the newspapers going to hell. They've got a couple of going to hell.
They've got a couple of going to hell, they've got a couple of reporters in that newspaper who are so reporters in that newspaper who are so reporters in that newspaper who are so bad with, I mean, lack of talent, but it's bad with, I mean, lack of Talent, but it's bad with, I mean, lack of talent, but it's going to hell.
So I think maybe what going to hell? So I think maybe what going to hell. So I think maybe what we'll do, maybe we'll start thinking we'll do - maybe we'll start thinking we'll do - maybe we'll start thinking about taking their press credentials about taking their press credentials about taking their press credentials away from them.
I think, I think you know, when they write, I think, I think you know when they write, I think, I think you know, when they write dishonest stories, you can't read them dishonest stories. You can't read them dishonest stories, you can't read them. There's so much - you can't read them. There's so much - you can't read them.
There's so much you can't read them. There's so much I'd be reading all day. There's so much I'd be reading all day. There's so much I'd be reading all day long when they write this on his stories long when they write this on his stories long when they write this on his stories, we should be a little bit tough, don't we - we should be a little bit tough.
Don't we - we should be a little bit tough, don't we agree, you know, real garbage, their agree, you know, real garbage, their agree, you know, real garbage, their garbage, it's a garbage paper, okay. So garbage, it's a garbage paper, okay. So garbage, it's a garbage paper, okay. So, here's the story folks talking about, here's the story folks talking about, here's the story, folks talking about garbage, talking about garbage, talking about garbage, you have a talking about garbage, you have a talking about garbage, you have a governor in this state who's done a very Governor in this state who's done a very governor in this state, who's done a very poor job, poor job, poor job, and he's backing crooked, Hillary Clinton and he's backing crooked, Hillary Clinton and he's backing crooked.
Hillary Clinton is a Democrat and many of you are, is a Democrat and many of you are, is a Democrat and many of you are Democrats. But I know you're voting for Democrats, but I know you're voting for Democrats. But I know you're voting for Trump. How many people in this room are Trump, how many people in this room are Trump, how many people in this room are Democrats?
It's a lot and how many people, Democrats, it's a lot and how many people, Democrats, it's a lot and how many people are voting for Trump. Yes, yeah, I'll tell are voting for Trump, yes, yeah, I'll tell are voting for Trump, yes, yeah, I'll tell you folks, I may be wrong and on November you folks I may be wrong and on November you folks I may be wrong.
And on November 8th, I'll say, well, I guess I was wrong 8th, I'll say, well, I guess I was wrong 8th, I'll say, well, I guess I was wrong, but there's something going on people, but there's something going on people, but there's something going on. People are sick and tired of incompetent, are sick and tired of incompetent are sick and tired of incompetent presidents like Obama is totally presidents like Obama is totally presidents like Obama is totally incompetent incompetent incompetent.
They're tired of a press that doesn't - they're tired of a press that doesn't - they're tired of a press that doesn't tell the correct story. All right, tell the correct story. All right, tell the correct story. All right? The media, the dishonesty, they're tired, the media, the dishonesty, they're tired, the media, the dishonesty, they're tired of crooked, Hillary Clinton for years and of crooked, Hillary Clinton for years and of crooked, Hillary Clinton for years and years.
It's going to be the same thing years. It's going to be the same thing years. It's going to be the same thing, four more years of Obama, four more years, four more years of Obama, four more years, four more years of Obama, four more years of Isis, four more years of high taxes of Isis. Four more years of high taxes of Isis, four more years of high taxes, did you see, hey, did you see what she did?
Did you see, hey, did you see what she did? Did you see, hey, did you see what she did? She came out with an economic plan. Now I - she came out with an economic plan now I - she came out with an economic plan. Now I have to be honest, I'll tell you, I'm no have to be honest. I'll tell you, I'm no have to be honest.
I'll tell you, I'm no fan of The Washington Post either fan of The Washington Post either fan of The Washington Post either, although they've been much nicer lately, although they've been much nicer lately. Although they've been much nicer lately, I must say I banned them about two. I must say I banned them about two, I must say I banned them about two months ago, but maybe I'll let them back months ago, but maybe I'll let them back months ago, but maybe I'll let them back in.
They've been much better. He's saying in they've been much better. He's saying in they've been much better. He's saying no, don't bother. Probably. You're probably no, don't bother. Probably. You're probably - no, don't bother. Probably. You're probably right. But the Washington Post did a big, right. But the Washington Post did a big, right, but the Washington Post did a big front-page story on crooked, Hillary and front-page story on crooked Hillary and front-page story on crooked, Hillary.
And it was done about a week ago, Washington. It was done about a week ago. Washington. It was done about a week ago, Washington Post. I'm only taking one pictures a big Post. I'm only taking one pictures a big Post. I'm only taking one pictures, a big story as Senator Clinton promised story as Senator Clinton promised story as Senator Clinton promised 200,000 jobs in upstate upstate New York; 200,000 jobs in upstate upstate New York, 200,000 jobs in upstate upstate New York, which by the way, is a Disaster area, okay, which by the way is a disaster area, okay, which by the way is a disaster area, okay.
I love those people they have lost. So I love those people they have lost. So I love those people. They have lost so much. They are great people and they're much - they are great people and they're much - they are great people and they're with Trump, I think like a hundred with Trump, I think like a hundred with Trump, I think like a hundred percent, okay.
I won New York State in a percent, okay? I won New York State in a percent, okay? I won New York State in a massive landslide. And by the way, I won massive landslide. And by the way, I won massive landslide. And by the way, I won Connecticut in a massive landslide. So it says here a senator, I'm adding one.
So it says here a senator, I'm adding one. So it says here a senator, I'm adding one word, crooked. Clinton promised two word, crooked. Clinton promised two word crooked, Clinton promised two hundred thousand jobs and upsetting, tell hundred thousand jobs and upsetting, tell hundred thousand jobs and upsetting tell you who got the jobs or consultants got.
You who got the jobs or consultants got you who got the jobs or consultants got the job in upstate New York, her efforts, the job in upstate New York, her efforts, the job in upstate New York, her efforts fell flat. Look at them, okay. You got a fell flat, look at them, okay? You got a fell flat. Look at them, okay?
You got a cameras - oh, now they're turning away. You cameras, oh, now they're turning away. You cameras, oh, now they're turning away. You see now they're turning away. They don't see now they're turning away. They don't see now they're turning away. They don't want to see that they don't want to see - want to see that.
They don't want to see - want to see that. They don't want to see - no, they don't want to see them, but her - no, they don't want to see them. But her - no, they don't want to see them. But her efforts fell flat. And I'll tell you, the efforts fell flat and I'll tell you the efforts fell flat. And I'll tell you the story because I was there, she was story because I was there.
She was story because I was there. She was running for the Senate. She made all running for the Senate, she made all running for the Senate. She made all sorts of promises and the promises were sorts of promises and the promises were sorts of promises and the promises were not kept okay. They were not kept and New not kept okay, they were not kept and New not kept okay, they were not kept.
And New York State, upstate New York became a York State, upstate New York became a York State, upstate New York became a disaster area. What happened as the jobs disaster area, what happened as the jobs disaster area, what happened as the jobs left for Mexico and other places she left for Mexico and other places she left for Mexico and other places she couldn't get anything passed except the couldn't get anything Passed, except the couldn't get anything passed except the name on a small building someplace she name on a small building someplace she name on a small building someplace.
She had no power in the Senate. People didn't had no power in the Senate. People didn't had no power in the Senate. People didn't respect her. She had no strength respect her. She had no strength respect her. She had no strength. She needs the right temperament. She's a, she needs the right temperament.
She's a, she needs the right temperament. She's a weak temperament, although The Secret weak temperament, although The Secret weak temperament, although The Secret Service agent said she's essentially Service agent said she's essentially Service agent said she's essentially crazy. So I think I believe that and crazy.
So I think I believe that and crazy. So I think I believe that and these guys know her pretty well, but you these guys know her pretty well, but you these guys know her pretty well. But you know, she said, I don't know if you heard know she said, I don't know if you heard know she said, I don't know if you heard her not so long ago reading off a her not so long ago reading off a her not so long Ago reading off a teleprompter, I assume she goes you ever teleprompter I assume she goes you ever teleprompter I assume she goes, you ever see her stand up in front of eight, nine, see her stand up in front of eight, nine, see her stand up in front Of eight, nine, ten thousand people without a ten thousand people without a ten thousand people without a teleprompter.
Now maybe maybe I don't teleprompter now, maybe maybe I don't teleprompter now, maybe maybe I don't think so, but she's reading off and she think so. But she's reading off and she think so, but she's reading off and she said, I don't like Donald Trump's tone. I said, I don't like Donald Trump's tone. I said I don't like Donald Trump's tone.
I don't like Donald Trump's tongue and I don't like Donald Trump's tongue and I don't like Donald Trump's tongue and I thought about it. So giacomo, she said she thought about it. So giacomo, she said she thought about it. So giacomo, she said she doesn't like my tone, Giacomo likes my, doesn't like my tone.
Giacomo likes my, doesn't like my tone. Giacomo likes my time. So she said, I don't like Donald time. So she said, I don't like Donald time. So she said, I don't like Donald Trump's tone and I'm saying to myself Trump's tone and I'm saying to myself Trump's tone and I'm saying to myself, you know and I - you know and I - you know and I to the press with it cuz, I asked me To the press with it cuz, I asked me to the press with it cuz, I asked me about it.
I said we have people in the about it. I said we have people in the about it. I said we have people in the Middle East whose heads are being Middle East, whose heads are being Middle East, whose heads are being chopped off, especially if they're chopped off, especially if they're chopped off, especially if they're Christian.
We have people being drowned. Christian. We have people being drowned, Christian. We have people being drowned in steel cages. We have people being in steel cages. We have people being in steel cages. We have people being buried alive in the sand and this buried alive in the sand and this buried alive in the sand and this politician, there's no change politician politician, there's no change politician politician, there's no change politician.
She won't change. A thing is saying she - she won't change a thing is saying she she won't change. A thing is saying she doesn't like Donald Trump's tone doesn't like Donald Trump's tone doesn't like Donald Trump's tone. She has. Isis has developed like wild she has. Isis has developed like wild she has.
Isis has developed like wild fire under our incompetent President, fire under our incompetent President, fire under our incompetent President, Obama. Obama Obama I saw the other day they were in 8. I saw the other day they were in 8. I saw the other day, they were in 8 countries now they think it's 28 countries.
Now they think it's 28 countries now. They think it's 28 countries during his period, 28 countries, countries during his period, 28 countries, countries during his period, 28 countries, right? They're going like wildfire, but right, they're going like wildfire. But right, they're going like wildfire, but they were in 8 and now they're in 28 and they were in 8 and now they're in 28 and they were in 8 and now they're in 28. And I actually said to the press and I said I actually said to the press and I said I actually said to the press and I said to a big group of people, it's the - to a big group of people, it's the - to a big group of People, it's the opinion of myself and a lot of people opinion of myself and a lot of people opinion of myself and a lot of people that he was the founder of Isis because of his weak policies and because because of his weak policies and because - because Of his weak policies and because he felt he failed because he failed to, he felt he failed because he failed to.
He felt he failed because he failed to get him out because he failed to do get him out because he failed to do get him out. Because he failed to do something about it and I said, but they something about it and I said, but they something about it and I said, but they wouldn't let that go along that he is wouldn't let that go along that he is wouldn't let that go Along that he is going to be presented over the next going to be presented over the next going to be presented over the next short period of time with the MVP award short period of time with the MVP award short period of time.
With the MVP award from Isis, Most Valuable Player now they from Isis Most Valuable Player now they from Isis Most Valuable Player now they didn't put that down. You know what, they didn't put that down. You know what, they didn't put that down. You know what they did did did crooked CNN, CNN is so disgusting, CNN, crooked, CNN, CNN is so disgusting, CNN, crooked, CNN, CNN is so disgusting, CNN oh, look, the camera just set off their, oh, look, the camera just set off their, oh, look, the camera just Set off their camera just went off, that's funny.
I got camera just went off, that's funny. I got camera just went off, that's funny. I got to know all the cameras, all those red to know all the cameras, all those red to know all the cameras, all those red lights on. You know what I just said, CNN lights on, you know what I just said, CNN lights on, you know what I just said, CNN is disgusting and by the way their is disgusting and by the way their is disgusting and by the way their ratings are going Down big league you ratings are going down, big league you ratings are going down big league, you know why?
Because I refused to be know why? Because I refused to be know why, because I refused to be interviewed and I get high ratings. What interviewed and I get high ratings, what interviewed and I get high ratings, what can I tell you? But I refuse and it's a can I tell you, but I refuse and it's a can I tell you, but I refuse and it's a constant hit on Trump.
And people are constant hit on Trump and people are constant hit on Trump and people are saying what is it no matter what you do saying, what is it no matter what you do saying, what is it? No matter what you do, no matter how good it is, they make it no matter how good it is, they make it no matter how good it is, they make it hit.
So CNN took this story and we said hit. So CNN took this story and we said hit. So CNN took this story and we said right, the founder and we said the MVP, right, the founder, and we said the MVP, right, the founder and we said the MVP well, they cut it all off. So I said I well, they cut it all off. So I said I well they cut it all off.
So I said I said Barack Obama is the founder of Isis. Said Barack Obama is the founder of Isis. Said Barack Obama is the founder of Isis. Then I talked about you're all screaming then I talked about you're all screaming then I talked about you're all screaming it over here, right? Then I talked about it over here, right then I talked about it over here, right then I talked about receiving the Most Valuable Player Award receiving the Most Valuable Player Award receiving the Most Valuable Player Award.
And I said about her receiving the most and I said about her receiving the most and I said about her receiving the most woth, right. Yeah, the most her you can woth, right. Yeah, the most her you can woth, right, yeah, the most her you can keep Hutu health care, but look receiving keep Hutu health care, but look receiving keep Hutu health care, but look receiving the most valuable plague.
So they cut it the most valuable plague. So they cut it the most valuable plague, so they cut it. So they have it. Donald Trump said that. So they have it. Donald Trump said that. So they have it. Donald Trump said that he is the founder of Isis. Then they - he is the founder of Isis, then they - he is the founder of Isis, then they debated for two days.
So I think he's debated for two days. So I think he's debated for two days. So I think he's wrong. I think these people are so wrong. I think these people are so wrong. I think these people are so dishonest the media and I love tell it's dishonest the media and I love tell it's dishonest the media and I love tell it's like the baby, like the baby, like the baby they said I threw a baby, it turned out.
I - they said - I threw a baby, it turned out, I - they said I threw a baby, it turned out. I didn't throw out a baby fact. The mother didn't throw out a baby fact. The mother didn't throw out a baby fact. The mother went on television saying how she loves went on television, saying how she loves, went on television, saying how she loves me.
I love that mother. So - so look, here's a - I love that mother. So - so look, here's a - I love that mother. So, so look, here's a story, folks story, folks, story folks, remember this, you got to remember this, remember this, you got to remember this, remember this, you got to remember this because she came out with a plan to very - because she came out with a plan to Very because she came out with a plan to very substantially raise your taxes that's substantially raise your taxes that's substantially raise your taxes.
That's all you need in Connecticut, more taxes, all you need in Connecticut, more taxes, all you need in Connecticut, more taxes. She is going to raise your taxes. She's she is going to raise your taxes. She's she is going to raise your taxes. She's going to raise your regulations for your - going to raise your regulations for your - going to raise your regulations for your businesses, which is going to put businesses which is going to put businesses, which is going to put everybody in a world, Obamacare.
She wants everybody in a world, Obamacare, she wants everybody in a world, Obamacare, she wants to keep and make it more expensive and to keep and make it more expensive and to keep and make it more expensive. And you're gonna have by the way you are, you're gonna have by the way you are, you're gonna have by the way you are going to have increases come November, going to have increases come November, going to have increases come November the likes of Which you have never seen the likes of which you have never seen the likes of which you have never seen on your horrible Obamacare.
Remember, keep on your horrible Obamacare. Remember, keep on your horrible Obamacare, remember keep you playing, keep you doctor all a big you playing, keep you doctor all a big you playing keep you doctor all a big lie lie lie. Remember the scam artist, a young, you remember the scam artist a young, you remember the scam artist a young, you know semi smart guy that came out and he know semi smart guy that came out and he know semi smart guy that came out and he scammed The public and he was bragging scammed the public and he was bragging scammed the public and he was bragging to his friends.
Unfortunately, one of to his friends, unfortunately one of to his friends, unfortunately one of Mehta Cameron, he was Gruber Gruber, my Mehta Cameron, he was Gruber Gruber, my Mehta Cameron, he was Gruber Gruber. My man, he remembers see the problem is man, he remembers see. The problem is man, he remembers see the problem is people forget, but I won't let him forget people forget, but I won't let him forget people forget, but I won't let him forget Gruber what was his first name.
Jonathan Gruber, what was his first name Jonathan Gruber? What was his first name, Jonathan Gruber you're very good Jonathan Gruber Gruber you're very good, Jonathan Gruber Gruber you're very good Jonathan Gruber and what school did he go to and what school did he go to and what school did he go to? He taught at a school, Jonathan Gruber, he taught at a school, Jonathan Gruber.
He taught at a school, Jonathan Gruber from MIT, my uncle was at MIT for many, from MIT. My uncle was at MIT for many from MIT. My uncle was at MIT for many years of teacher at MIT, a professor years of teacher at MIT, a professor years of teacher at MIT, a professor Jonathan Gruber of MIT, mark it down, Jonathan Gruber of MIT, mark it down, Jonathan Gruber of MIT, mark it down.
Remember, he said the whole deal is to remember he said the whole deal is to remember he said the whole deal is to scam and he was bragging to his friends scam and he was bragging to his friends scam and he was bragging to his friends. I don't know what kind of a friend, but I don't know what kind of a friend, but I don't know what kind of a friend, but he had his cell phone running.
I don't he had his cell phone running. I don't he had his cell phone running. I don't think it's a good friend, but you know think it's a good friend, but you know think it's a good friend, but you know what probably his so-called friend was what probably his so-called friend was what probably his so-called friend was even incensed at it.
Jonathan Gruber of even incensed at it, Jonathan Gruber of even incensed at it, Jonathan Gruber of MIT said Obamacare is essentially a scam. MIT said Obamacare is essentially a scam. MIT said Obamacare is essentially a scam. So now in Texas just recently through so now in Texas just recently through so now in Texas just recently through Blue Cross Blue Shield, they announced Blue Cross Blue Shield, they announced Blue Cross Blue Shield, they announced almost a 50 % increase, almost a 50 % increase.
Now what's going almost a 50 % increase now, what's going almost a 50 % increase. Now what's going to happen is on November 1st, remember to happen is on November 1st, remember to happen is on November 1st. Remember this folks on November 1st, they are this folks on November 1st. They are this folks on November 1st, they are going to announce, earth-shattering, going to announce, earth-shattering, going to announce, earth-shattering election shattering, an increase that's election shattering, an increase that's election shattering, an increase.
That's so big that you will never ever in a so big that you will never ever in a so big that you will never ever in a million years vote for Hillary Clinton million years vote for Hillary Clinton million years vote for Hillary Clinton. But remember this, they wanted to lay and - but remember this, they wanted to lay and - but remember this, they wanted to lay and I tell you this too, the Republican Party, I tell you this too, the Republican Party, I tell you this too, the Republican Party, you Better get tough, they wanted to lay you better, get tough, they wanted to lay you better, get tough, they wanted to lay it till December 1st till after the it till December 1st till after the it till December 1st till after the election, election election don't let It happen, so here's his story, don't let it happen.
So here's his story. Don't let it happen. So here's his story. Washington Post, she fucked, she did not Washington Post. She fucked. She did not Washington Post. She fucked. She did not fulfill what she said. It's a wasteland fulfill what she said, it's a wasteland fulfill what she said, it's a wasteland what happened and what she did was a - what happened and what she did was a - what happened and what she did was a disaster.
The people in upstate New York disaster. The people in upstate New York disaster, the people in upstate New York hate Hillary Clinton. They hate her, she hate Hillary Clinton. They hate her, she hate Hillary Clinton. They hate her. She lied to him. She lied to him. She lied to lied to him. She lied to him, she lied to lied to him.
She lied to him. She lied to him. You have to go up there, her husband him, you have to go up there, her husband him. You have to go up there, her husband, Bill Clinton, who by the way remember what he said, he did not have. Remember what he said, he did not have. Remember what he said, he did not have sex with that woman, then a couple of sex with that woman, then a couple of sex with that woman then a couple of weeks later.
Oh, you got me? Oh, I'm so glad weeks later. Oh, you got me. Oh, I'm so glad weeks later. Oh, you got me. Oh, I'm so glad they kept the dress. I'm so glad they - they kept the dress. I'm so glad they - they kept the dress. I'm so glad they kept that dress. Alright, it's great. You kept that dress. Alright.
It's great, you kept that dress, alright, it's great. You know why, because it shows what the hell know why because it shows what the hell know why because it shows what the hell they are. Alright, they are alright, they are alright, it shows what they are. So here's the - it shows what they are, so here's the - it shows what they are.
So here's the story. As Senator Clinton promised two story as Senator Clinton promised two story as Senator Clinton promised two hundred thousand jobs. Now here's in the hundred thousand jobs. Now here's in the hundred thousand jobs now. Here's in the New York Post very recently by a great New York Post very recently by a great New York Post very recently by a great writer, Steve quaza writer, Steve quaza writer, Steve quaza, how Donald Trump helped save New York.
How Donald Trump helped save New York how Donald Trump helped save New York City long before Donald Trump stamped his long before Donald Trump stamped his long before Donald Trump stamped his name in gold on buildings around the name in gold on buildings around the name. In gold on buildings around the world post his snarky midnight tweets world post his snarky midnight tweets world post his snarky midnight tweets.
It's true and joined the race for the - it's true and joined the race for the - it's true and joined the race for the White House White House White House. He was New York's most important and he was New York's most important and he was New York's most important and bravest real estate developer. I did a bravest real estate developer.
I did a bravest real estate developer. I did a good job. I did a good job. Whatever you - good job, I did a good job, whatever you good job, I did a good job whatever you think about his political views, all think about his political views, all think about his political views. All right, I understand that.
But they say or right, I understand that, but they say or right, I understand that. But they say or his campaign they say is crazy. His campaign they say is crazy. His campaign they say is crazy. It is pretty wild. Let's face it, Trump. It is pretty wild, let's face it, Trump, it is pretty wild. Let's face it.
Trump doesn't get enough credit for being a - doesn't get enough credit for being a - doesn't get enough credit for being a transformative planner who is in love transformative planner who is in love transformative planner who is in love with the city of New York. I'm also love with the city of New York.
I'm also love with the city of New York. I'm also love with Connecticut by the way, I'm really with Connecticut, by the way, I'm really with Connecticut, by the way, I'm really - I'm really in love with our country. I'm really in love with our country, I'm really in love with our country, nice, nice, nice Trump waded into a landscape of empty Trump waded into a landscape of empty Trump waded into a landscape of empty Fifth Avenue store fronts.
By the way, New Fifth Avenue store fronts, by the way, New Fifth Avenue store fronts, by the way, New York City was a disaster. You remember York City was a disaster. You remember York City was a disaster. You remember nobody wanted to invest. It was over. Nobody wanted to invest, it was over. Nobody wanted to invest.
It was over. Remember, President Ford said go to hell. Remember, President Ford said go to hell. Remember, President Ford said go to hell it was over for New York, it was going to - it was over for New York, it was going to - it was over for New York, it was going to go down. The tubes go down, the tubes go down, the tubes Trump waded into a landscape of empty Trump waded into a landscape of empty Trump waded into a landscape of empty Fifth Avenue storefronts.
The Dust Bowl, Fifth Avenue, storefronts, the Dust Bowl, Fifth Avenue, storefronts, the Dust Bowl, muggings and ground around Central Park, muggings and ground around Central Park, muggings and ground around Central Park at a Wall Street area. Seemingly on its at a Wall Street area seemingly on its at a Wall Street area seemingly on its last legs as companies moved out does last legs as companies moved out does last legs as companies moved out.
Does that sound familiar companies, companies that sound familiar companies, companies that sound familiar companies, companies were moving out like crazy, which was - were moving out like crazy which was - were moving out like crazy, which was then a remote offshore island, few other then a remote offshore island.
Few other then a remote offshore island, few other developers built anything but plain developers built anything but plain developers built anything but plain vanila office and apartment buildings, vanila office and apartment buildings, vanila office and apartment buildings Trump almost by force of will and by the Trump Almost by force of will and by the Trump almost by force of will and by the way this is a great writer, is a tough way.
This is a great writer, is a tough way. This is a great writer, is a tough writer, a very smart guy, tough critic writer, a very smart guy, tough critic writer, a very smart guy, tough critic Trump almost by force of will rode to Trump almost by force of will rode to Trump almost by force Of will rode to the rescue expressing rare faith that's the rescue expressing rare faith, that's the rescue expressing rare faith.
That's what we're going to do for the country. What we're going to do for the country, what we're going to do for the country folks. Now this is a long article that had now this is a long article that had now this is a long article that had talked about a lot of the jobs that I've talked about. A lot of the jobs that I've talked about, a lot of the jobs that I've done expressing rare faith in the future, done expressing rare faith in the future, done expressing rare faith in the future.
He was instrumental in kick-starting the he was instrumental in kick-starting the he was instrumental in kick-starting the regeneration of neighborhoods and regeneration of neighborhoods and regeneration of neighborhoods and landmarks almost given up for dead now landmarks almost given up for dead now landmarks almost given up for Dead now in all fairness, because I - you know, hey, in all fairness, because I - you know, hey, in all fairness, because I - you know, hey, look, I have like 80 people, she's got a look, I have like 80 people.
She's got a look, I have like 80 people, she's got a thousand. They're hiring like crazy. We're thousand, they're hiring like crazy. We're thousand, they're hiring like crazy. We're doing great. We're raising a lot of money, doing great. We're raising a lot of money, doing great. We're raising a lot of money.
I'm putting up my money for me. I'm - I'm putting up my money for me. I'm - I'm putting up my money for me. I'm raising money for the Republican Party, raising money for the Republican Party, raising money for the Republican Party. I'm raising money for the Republican, I'm raising money for the Republican, I'm raising money for the Republican Party, but I'm - you know, in the primaries Party, but I'm - you know, in the primaries Party, but I'm - you know, in the primaries, I put up my money here.
I'm putting up a - I put up my money here, I'm putting up a - I put up my money here, I'm putting up a lot of money folks. I got a lot of money, lot of money folks. I got a lot of money, lot of money folks. I got a lot of money in this, boy, I'll tell you what, but I'm in this, boy, I'll tell you what.
But I'm in this, boy, I'll tell you what. But I'm not going to be controlled by lobbyists not going to be controlled by lobbyists, not going to be controlled by lobbyists. I'm not going to be controlled by - I'm not going to be controlled by - I'm not going to be controlled by special. So, so here's the story.
She is totally so. So here's the story. She is totally so. So here's the story. She is totally controlled by the hedge fund, people who controlled by the hedge fund people who controlled by the hedge fund people who I know very well. These are defined, but I know very well these are defined, but I know very well these are defined, but these are not nice people.
These are not - these are not nice people. These are not - these are not nice people. These are not people that say I'm doing this for the people that say I'm doing this for the people that say I'm doing this for the good of the country. They're doing this good of the country. They're doing this good of the country.
They're doing this for the good of themselves and when they for the good of themselves and when they for the good of themselves and when they give two million, three million, five give two million, three million, five give two million, three million, five million, ten million to Crooked Hillary million, ten million to crooked Hillary million, ten million to crooked.
Hillary Clinton. They're gonna get a lot back. And Clinton, they're gonna get a lot back. And Clinton, they're gonna get a lot back and it's going to be a lot more than that. It's going to be a lot more than that. It's going to be a lot more than that and what's going to happen, what's going and what's going to happen, what's going and what's going to happen, what's going to happen.
Remember this, they are going to happen. Remember this, they are going to happen. Remember this, they are going to make deals that are bad for a country to make deals that are bad for a country to make deals that are bad for a country, but good for them, including deals where but good for them, including deals where but good for Them including deals where certain companies can move to Mexico and certain companies can move to Mexico.
And certain companies can move to Mexico and other places because a lot of Marone by other places, because a lot of Marone by other places. Because a lot of Marone by these guys and you know what folks if I these guys and you know what folks if I - these guys and you know what folks if I get in, that's not going to happen, okay, get in.
That's not going to happen, okay. Get in that's not going to happen, okay, because I couldn't give a damn for because I couldn't give a damn for because I couldn't give a damn for. So here's what happened recently. So here's what happened recently. So here's what happened recently: campaign contributions from hedge campaign, contributions from hedge campaign contributions from hedge funders, right?
You see the nice picture I funders, right? You see the nice picture I funders, right? You see the nice picture I used of Hillary, how pretty, pretty see used of Hillary, how pretty, pretty see used of Hillary, how pretty pretty see how pretty she is. Now they gave me a how pretty she is now they gave me a how pretty she is now they gave me a very bad picture of her.
They gave me a very bad picture of her. They gave me a very bad picture of her. They gave me a picture that wasn't representative of picture that wasn't representative of picture that wasn't representative of what Hillary looked like. And I said I'm what Hillary looked like and I said I'm what Hillary looked like and I said I'm not using that picture.
I probably should not using that picture, I probably should not using that picture I probably should have, but I'm a true sportsman, right? So I have - but I'm a true sportsman, right? So I have - but I'm a true sportsman right? So I - I said we have to use a nice picture, but I said we have to use a nice picture, but I said we have to use a nice picture.
But here's the bad part of the picture. Here's the bad part of the picture. Here's the bad part of the picture, forty-eight million, five hundred forty-eight million, five hundred forty-eight million, five hundred thousand received from the hedge funders, thousand received from the hedge funders, thousand received from the hedge funders and that's Center for Responsive and that's Center for Responsive and that's Center for Responsive Politics, very respected, right.
So it's Politics very respected, right. So it's Politics very respected, right. So it's forty eight million, five hundred, forty eight million, five hundred, forty eight million, five hundred thousand for Hillary nineteen thousand thousand for Hillary nineteen thousand thousand for Hillary nineteen thousand bucks for Trump.
And I'm trying to figure bucks for Trump and I'm trying to figure bucks for Trump and I'm trying to figure out who the hell gave me the money I out who the hell gave me the money I out who the hell gave me the money. I can't believe that they gave it. I'll can't believe that they gave it. I'll can't believe that they gave it.
I'll probably give it back what does you know, probably give it back what does you know, probably give it back what does you know total national debt. So when Obama became total national debt, so when Obama became total national debt, so when Obama became president, he has now doubled our president. He has now doubled our president.
He has now doubled our national debt and I'll tell you national debt and I'll tell you national debt and I'll tell you, I'll tell you the problem with that by - I'll tell you the problem with that by - I'll tell you the problem with that. By the way, I - you didn't get what I said, but the way I - you didn't get what I said, but the way I - you didn't get what I said, but I loved when CNN turned off its camera.
I loved when CNN turned off its camera. I loved when CNN turned off its camera as soon as I started telling you what, as soon as I started telling you what, as soon as I started telling you what sleaze they are, I just sleaze they are. I just sleaze they are. I just - I like that camera folks, can you imagine, I like that camera folks, can you imagine, I like that camera folks, can you imagine having it on live television, having it on live television, having it on live television, you know the good thing nobody's, you know The good thing nobody's - you know the good thing, nobody's watching them anyway.
So from look at the corner of that room, they look at the corner of that room. They look at the corner of that room. They even have people standing behind the - even have people standing behind the - even have people standing behind the cameras. You know what if it were up to cameras, you know what if it were up to cameras, you know what if it were up to me, I'd move those damn cameras.
The hell me, I'd move those damn cameras, the hell me, I'd move those damn cameras. The hell out and let the people see properly, I'd out and let the people see properly, I'd out and let the people see properly, I'd move them out. So here's our president, move them out. So here's our president, move them out.
So here's our president. Here's our president, who is by the way, here's our president, who is by the way, here's our president, who is by the way going to go down as perhaps the worst going to go down as perhaps the worst going to go down as perhaps the worst president In the history of this country, president in the history of this country, president in the history of this country, believe me, believe me.
So here's our believe, me, believe me. So here's our believe me, believe me. So here's our president. He's doubled our national debt president. He's doubled our national debt president. He's doubled our national debt and yet our country's a mess our roads and yet our country's a mess, our roads and yet our country's a mess.
Our roads haven't been built. Our infrastructure haven't been built. Our infrastructure haven't been built. Our infrastructure, our tunnels, our bridges, our hospitals, our tunnels, our bridges, our hospitals, our tunnels, our bridges, our hospitals, nothing's working. We have bridges, many, nothing's working.
We have bridges, many, nothing's working, we have bridges, many of them are in danger of falling down of them are in danger of falling down of them are in danger of falling down. You see the reports. So we have this, you see the reports. So we have this, you see the reports, so we have this massive debt we've taken in money.
He's massive debt. We've taken in money, he's massive debt. We've taken in money, he's wasted it. I'll tell you, I saw one wise wasted it. I'll tell you, I saw one wise wasted it, I'll tell you, I saw one wise in a certain community, three, four days in a certain community, three, four days in a certain community, three, four days ago, great.
I'm not gonna mention the. Ago, great, I'm not gonna mention the ago, great. I'm not gonna mention the community because they're heavily in community because they're heavily in community because they're heavily in favor of Trump. They're building a favor of Trump. They're building a favor of Trump. They're building a Veterans Administration Hospital, not a Veterans Administration Hospital, not a Veterans Administration Hospital, not a real big one there, 1.2 billion dollars real big one there, 1.2 billion dollars real big one there, 1.2 billion dollars over budget hospital, how many builders over budget hospital, how Many builders over budget hospital, how many builders are here people can you imagine 1.2 are here people can you imagine 1.2 are here, people can you imagine 1.2 billion dollars over budget now I would billion dollars over budget now I would billion dollars over budget now I Would be willing to bet that some of those be willing to bet that some of those be willing to bet that some of those subcontractors and contractors, I love subcontractors and contractors.
I love subcontractors and contractors. I love our contractors. I love our - our contractors. I love our - our contractors, I love our subcontractors, but we have to be smart subcontractors. But we have to be smart subcontractors. But we have to be smart because they're smarter than people that because they're smarter than people that because they're smarter than people that went to Harvard and Wharton and Yale, and went to Harvard and Wharton and Yale and went to Harvard and Wharton and Yale.
And some of them don't even speak the - some of them don't even speak the - some of them don't even speak the language well, but they're smarter so language well, but they're smarter so language well, but they're smarter. So this is a hospital built in our country. This is a hospital built in our country.
This is a hospital built in our country, not so far away, 1.2 billion dollar cost, not so far away 1.2 billion dollar cost, not so far away 1.2 billion dollar cost over what about that and this is just over what about that and this is just over What about that and this is just standard, I'm building a hotel on standard.
I'm building a hotel on standard. I'm building a hotel on Pennsylvania Avenue right next to the Pennsylvania Avenue right next to the Pennsylvania Avenue right next to the White House. I said I don't give a damn White House, I said I don't give a damn White House. I said I don't give a damn. I'm coming to Pennsylvania Avenue one.
I'm coming to Pennsylvania Avenue one, I'm coming to Pennsylvania Avenue one way or way or way or the other Trump international, it was the old post Trump international. It was the old post Trump international. It was the old post office building. It was the old post office building. It was the old post office building.
It was the old post office buildings, one of the most office buildings, one of the most office buildings, one of the most beautiful buildings in the country can beautiful buildings in the country can beautiful buildings in the country. Can you imagine? I got it through the Obama. You imagine I got it through the Obama, you imagine I got it through the Obama administration.
Does that tell you how administration does that tell you how administration does that tell you how good I am, does that tell you, I actually good, I am - does that tell you, I actually good, I am - does that tell you, I actually told my people I said Now now we want is told my people, I said now now we want is told my people.
I said now now we want is one of the most hotly contested jobs in one of the most hotly contested jobs in one of the most hotly contested jobs. In the history of the GSA and by the way, the history of the GSA and by the way the history of the GSA and by the way the GSA people are very professional. We - the GSA people are very professional.
We - the GSA people are very professional. We have some very good people in government, have some very good people in government, have some very good people in government with a little leadership. This country is with a little leadership, this country is - with a little leadership, this country is going to sail.
It's going to be so going to sail, it's going to be so going to sail, it's going to be so beautiful anyway. We're building a very beautiful anyway. We're building a very beautiful anyway. We're building a very, very complex, super luxury hotel is going very complex, super luxury hotel is going very complex.
Super luxury hotel is going to employ a lot of people. It's almost to employ a lot of people. It's almost to employ a lot of people. It's almost finished, finished finished. It's more than one year ahead of it's more than one year ahead of it's more than one year ahead of schedule and it's substantially under schedule and it's substantially under schedule and it's substantially under budget.
Is that nice? Okay, wouldn't it be budget, is that nice? Okay, wouldn't it be budget? Is that nice? Okay. Wouldn't it be great if our country could do things great if our country could do things great if our country could do things, we're there ahead of schedule and under. We're there ahead of schedule and under we're there ahead of schedule and under budget.
That's like you know what it's a budget that's like you know what it's a budget that's like you know what it's a little bit like. I say it. I spent with little bit like I say it, I spent with little bit like I say it, I spent with all the money I spent in the primaries, I all the money I spent in the primaries, I all the money I spent in the primaries.
I spent over 50 million now I'm spending a spent over 50 million now I'm spending a spent over 50 million. Now I'm spending a fortune for the general election, oh, you fortune for the general election, oh, you fortune for the general election? Oh, you better elect me folks, I'll never speak. Can you imagine - can you imagine how can you imagine - can you imagine how can you imagine can you imagine how badly I'll feel if I spent all of that badly, I'll feel if I spent all of that badly.
I'll feel if I spent all of that money, all of this energy, all of this money, all of this energy, all of this money, all of this energy, all of this time and lost I will never ever forgive time and lost. I will never ever forgive time. And lost, I will never ever forgive the people of Connecticut. I will never the people of Connecticut, I will never the people of Connecticut, I will never forgive the people of Florida and forgive the people of Florida and forgive the people of Florida and Pennsylvania and Ohio.
But I love them, Pennsylvania and Ohio, but I love them, Pennsylvania and Ohio, but I love them anyway. We'll see. I think we're gonna do anyway. We'll see. I think we're gonna do anyway. We'll see. I think we're gonna do very well. You know, you know, we had a very well, you know, you know, we had a very well, you know, you know, we had a thing in Europe now.
I have a lot of thing in Europe now. I have a lot of thing in Europe now. I have a lot of investments in the United Kingdom, great investments in the United Kingdom, great investments in the United Kingdom, great investments, the great, great things and investments, the great, great things and investments, the great, great things.
And you remember bricks it and they all went. You remember bricks it and they all went, you remember bricks it and they all went and as you know the UK took a big vote and as you know, the UK took a big vote and as you know, the UK took a big vote. They took a big vote and it was a vote. They took a big vote and it was a vote.
They took a big vote and it was a vote that ended up exactly as I predicted. That ended up exactly as I predicted. That ended up exactly as I predicted. Yeah, you can - you can get her out, Jenner, yeah, you can - you can get her out Jenner. Yeah, you can - you can get her out, Jenner, you know, she looks just like Hillary, you know, she looks just like Hillary, you know, she looks just like Hillary Clinton actually is that Hillary Hillary Clinton actually is that Hillary Hillary Clinton actually is that Hillary Hillary.
Is that you Hillary wants to find out is that you Hillary wants to find out is that you Hillary wants to find out how do you get these crowds right? How do - how do you get these crowds right? How do - how do you get these crowds right? How do you get these crowds? Goodbye. Hillary bye, you get these crowds.
Goodbye. Hillary bye, you get these crowds. Goodbye. Hillary bye say hello to Bill Hillary. Say hello to Bill Hillary. Say hello to Bill. Hillary, you know, I'm talking and I see this like, you know, I'm talking and I see this like, you know, I'm talking and I see this like crazy person screaming and I didn't know crazy person screaming and I didn't know crazy person screaming and I didn't know Friend or Foe, but then I watched and I Friend or Foe, but then I watched and I Friend or Foe, but then I watched and I could see she was nuts.
So look, look, we could see she was nuts. So look, look, we could see she was nuts. So look, look, we have such an important election, I want have such an important election. I want have such an important election. I want to talk to you for a couple of seconds to talk to you for a couple of seconds to talk to you for a couple of seconds about how bad your governor is.
He's a - about how bad your governor is. He's a about how bad your governor is. He's a very unpopular guy. He's done a very poor, very unpopular guy. He's done a very poor, very unpopular guy. He's done a very poor job for Connecticut. I'm telling you we job for Connecticut. I'm telling you, we job for Connecticut, I'm telling you we have one of the past great people of have one of the past great people of have one of the past great people of General Electric in our audience where General Electric in our audience where General Electric In our audience, where is John is - John is John, where is Giada's, John, they're great.
John, where is Giada's? John? They're great. John, where is Giada's? John? They're great. John Myers, right? One of the great people of Myers, right, one of the great people of Myers, right one of the great people of General Electric can you believe John, General Electric, can you believe John, General Electric, can you believe John, they're leaving your company is leaving, they're leaving your Company is leaving, they're leaving, your company is leaving, you wouldn't leave if Trump or governor you wouldn't leave if Trump or governor you wouldn't leave if Trump or governor I guarantee of that.
Is that right? Ah, I guarantee of that. Is that right? Ah? I guarantee of that is that right, ah, they're gonna be and you know what they - they're gonna be and you know what they - they're gonna be and you know what, they had very bad representation in had very bad representation in had very bad representation In Connecticut, because that's something Connecticut because that's something Connecticut because that's something that never should have happened.
Do you that never should have happened, do you that never should have happened? Do you agree with that? The great John Meyers agree with that. The great John Meyers agree with that, the great John Meyers folks sorry and much more importantly this and much more importantly this and much more importantly this incredible way we love having you both incredible way.
We love having you both incredible way. We love having you both here. Thank you here. Thank you here. Thank you pretty soon. He'll be up in Boston. He pretty soon. He'll be up in Boston. He pretty soon he'll be up in Boston. He won't be here anymore. Can you believe it won't be here anymore, can you believe it won't be here anymore?
Can you believe it? I can't believe General Electric, one of I can't believe General Electric, one of I can't believe General Electric, one of the great, great monster, great companies, the great, great monster, great companies, the great, great monster, great companies you lost it. So you got a vote for Trump.
You lost it, so you got a vote for Trump, you lost it. So you got a vote for Trump. You've got a vote for Trump just as a - you've got a vote for Trump just as a - you've got a vote for Trump just as a signal to yours, you're incompetent signal to yours. You're incompetent signal to yours. You're incompetent governor that you're not going to take governor that you're not going to take governor that you're not going to take it anymore.
Okay, you got it, you know he it anymore. Okay, you got it. You know he it anymore. Okay, you got it. You know he changes his name, I thought it was Daniel changes his name. I thought it was Daniel changes his name. I thought it was Daniel. Then I thought it was Dan. Then its then I thought it was Dan then its then I thought it was Dan.
Then its dental, Dan - oh, I've never heard of dental, dental, Dan. Oh, I've never heard of dental, dental, Dan. Oh, I've never heard of dental right? Where is he now? You're good at, right? Where is he now? You're good at, right? Where is he now? You're good at this stuff, where is he now dental? It's this stuff, where is he now dental?
It's this stuff. Where is he now dental? It's dannel malloy. Well, he wants to be saved. He wants Eva's well, he wants to be saved. He wants Eva's well. He wants to be saved, he wants Eva's career, so you got to do it, you know what career. So you got to do it, you know what career. So you got to do it.
You know what you do, do it as a protest vote against you do. Do it as a protest vote against you do, do it as a protest vote against your governor for losing General, your governor for losing General, your governor for losing General Electric? And why do you hear the stats Electric and why do you hear the stats Electric?
And why do you hear the stats? Because I have a statistician who's because I have a statistician who's because I have a statistician who's unbelievable. This guy loves being a unbelievable - this guy loves being a unbelievable - this guy loves being a statistician me. I would like it statistician me, I would like it statistician me.
I would like it by the way, policeman. Thank you very much. By the way, policeman, thank you very much. By the way, policeman, thank you very much. What a great job you did if getting rid what a great job you did if getting rid, what a great job you did if getting rid of Hillary, what a great job you did of Hillary, what a great job you did of Hillary?
What a great job you did? Thank you, man, man, by the way. How great, thank you, man, man, by the way. How great, thank you, man, man, by the way, how great are our police, they're great and it's about time. We - they're great and it's about time. We - they're great and it's about time. We treat them with the respect that they treat them with the respect that they treat them with the respect that they deserve, okay?
So listen to this folks deserve okay. So listen to this folks deserve okay. So listen to this folks, this is a statistician who works for me. This is a statistician who works for me. This is a statistician who works for me. He considers it the most exciting job he considers it the most exciting job he considers it the most exciting job his wife thinks.
He's unbelievable. His wife thinks he's unbelievable. His wife thinks he's unbelievable. She is so impressed with him, Connecticut. She is so impressed with him. Connecticut, she is so impressed with him. Connecticut has lost 1 in 3, manufacturing jobs since has lost 1 in 3, manufacturing jobs since has lost 1 in 3, manufacturing jobs since NAFTA. Bill Clinton signed it, the NAFTA Bill Clinton signed it, the NAFTA Bill Clinton signed it.
The Fairfield region has lost 1 in 3, Fairfield region has lost 1 in 3. Fairfield region has lost 1 in 3 manufacturing jobs since China joined manufacturing jobs since China joined manufacturing jobs since China joined the WTO since 2000. The number of the WTO since 2000. The number of the WTO since 2000, the number of unemployed people in Fairfield has more unemployed people in Fairfield has more unemployed.
People in Fairfield has more than doubled. Good luck folks than doubled. Good luck folks than doubled. Good luck folks by the way relax don't move the good by the way relax don't move the good by the way relax don't move. The good news is you can't move because you can't news is you can't move because you can't news is you can't move because you can't get anything for your house.
So don't get anything for your house. So don't get anything for your house. So don't worry about cancer, yeah, not like you're worry about cancer. Yeah, not like you're worry about cancer. Yeah, not like you're gonna be offered a fortune for your gonna be offered a fortune for your gonna be offered a fortune for your house.
So just relax house, so just relax house, so just relax riding to the rescue we're gonna bring riding to the rescue we're gonna bring riding to the rescue. We're gonna bring jobs back. We're gonna bring everything jobs back. We're gonna bring everything jobs back. We're gonna bring everything according to a recent report, Connecticut, according to a recent report, Connecticut, according to a recent report Connecticut is among the states where it is the - is among the states where it is the - is among the states where it is the hardest for Job seekers to find jobs, oh, hardest for job seekers to find jobs, oh, hardest for job seekers to find jobs, oh boy, boy, boy, and 40 percent of part-time workers in and 40 percent of part-time workers in and 40 percent of part-time workers in Connecticut would prefer.
Instead to have Connecticut would prefer instead to have Connecticut would prefer instead to have a full-time job, you know what did that a full-time job? You know, what did that a full-time job? You know what did that Obamacare larval Mercator Center reports, Obamacare, larval Mercator Center reports.
Obamacare larval Mercator Center reports Connecticut ranks. Congratulations on Connecticut ranks. Congratulations on Connecticut ranks. Congratulations on this one. Are you ready? I mean if you this one, are you ready? I mean if you this one, are you ready? I mean if you don't - if you don't vote for Trump after don't - if you don't vote for Trump after don't if you don't vote for Trump after reading.
And these are stats right out of reading and these are stats right out of reading and these are stats right out of a book right out of the book. This is a a book right out of the book. This is a a book right out of the book. This is a trump vote. Okay. Trump vote. Okay, trump vote, okay. Connecticut is the fourth highest and Connecticut is the fourth highest and Connecticut is the fourth highest and going to be the highest tax state in the - going to be the highest tax state in the - going to be the highest tax state in the country.
You're going to be number one country, you're going to be number one country, you're going to be number one. Congratulations. Congratulations everybody. You're going congratulations, everybody. You're going congratulations, everybody. You're going to be number one and now Hillary Clinton to be number one and now Hillary Clinton to be number one.
And now Hillary Clinton, Hillary rotten Clinton is going to raise. Hillary rotten Clinton is going to raise. Hillary rotten Clinton is going to raise taxes by 1.3 trillion dollars, taxes by 1.3 trillion, dollars, taxes by 1.3 trillion dollars, congratulations and Donald Trump as congratulations and Donald Trump as congratulations and Donald Trump as president is going to cut your middle president is going to cut Your middle president is going to cut your middle class taxes way down.
He's going to get class taxes way down. He's going to get class taxes way down. He's going to get rid of massive, massive, horrible rid of massive, massive, horrible rid of massive, massive, horrible job-killing regulations is going very job-killing. Regulations is going very job-killing. Regulations is going very importantly, your businesses are all importantly your businesses are all importantly your businesses are all leaving because the taxes are too high leaving because the taxes are too high leaving because the taxes are too high.
You know, we're all standing in here. You know, we're all standing in here. You know, we're all standing in here tonight on a blistering 105 degrees tonight on a blistering 105 degrees tonight on a blistering 105 degrees outside. And I think 125 degrees inside, we should have - we should have put some - we should have - we should have put some - we should have - we should have put some air-conditioning units, right, but - well, air-conditioning units, right?
But - well, air-conditioning units, right? But well, nobody wants to leave, right, isn't it? Nobody wants to leave, right, isn't it? Nobody wants to leave, right? Isn't it great when we can have a room? That's great. When we can have a room that's great when we can have a room that's like 115 degrees and we haven't lost one like 115 degrees and we haven't lost one like 115 degrees and we haven't lost one person is that great.
And I've been doing person is that great and I've been doing person is that great. And I've been doing this for a while. All right, listen to this for a while. All right, listen to this for a while. All right, listen to this, listen to this Connecticut, this listen to this Connecticut, this listen to this Connecticut dental dental, they did off, get back here.
Dental, dental, they did off, get back here. Dental, dental, they did off, get back here from Washington. He's in Washington from Washington, he's in Washington from Washington. He's in Washington trying to get a job, but he won't be able trying to get a job, but he won't be able trying to get a job, but he won't be able to, because I would never hire him.
So why to - because I would never hire him. So why to - because I would never hire him, so why is he wasting his time, is he wasting his time, is he wasting his time Danno listen to this just to show you Danno listen to this just to show you Danno listen to this just to show You how bad - how bad your governor is and by how bad, how bad your governor is and by how bad, how bad your governor is?
And by the way is Linda here, where's Linda, the way is Linda here. Where's Linda, the way is Linda here. Where's Linda? Linda McMahon, what a great woman, lot of Linda McMahon, what a great woman, lot of Linda McMahon, what a great woman, lot of grit, where is what a great woman, where grit, where is what a great woman, where grit, where is what a great woman?
Where is she is she is she? She's here a lot of people here. She's here a lot of people here. She's here a lot of people here. We love Linda. Hey, she exposed your, we love Linda. Hey, she exposed your, we love Linda. Hey, she exposed your senator as being a total fraud. He said senator as being a total fraud, he said senator as being a total fraud.
He said he was in Vietnam or wherever he was. He was in Vietnam or wherever he was. He was in Vietnam or wherever he was supposed to be. This great fighting, supposed to be this great fighting, supposed to be this great fighting machine. He went around for years saying machine, he went around for years saying machine, he went around for years saying that he was a great Vietnam fighter that he was a great Vietnam fighter that he was a great Vietnam fighter telling false tales, telling everything, telling false tales, Telling everything, telling false tales, telling everything Linda exposed him, where's Linda, Linda, Linda exposed him, where's Linda, Linda?
Linda exposed him, where's Linda? Linda exposed him and he got elected how the exposed him and he got elected how the exposed him and he got elected. How the hell do you elect a guy like that? Boy, hell, do you elect a guy like that? Boy, hell, do you elect a guy like that? Boy Blumenthal, senator Blumenthal a great Blumenthal, senator Blumenthal a great Blumenthal, senator Blumenthal a great fighter for Vietnam.
So look at this, this fighter for Vietnam. So look at this, this fighter for Vietnam. So look at this, this is a beauty for dental, Dan. Oh, Malloy is a beauty for dental, Dan. Oh Malloy is a beauty for dental, Dan Oh Malloy, your governor, lost General Electric and your governor lost General Electric and your governor lost General Electric and kinetic Franks Connecticut ranks number.
Kinetic Franks Connecticut ranks number kinetic Franks Connecticut ranks number 50th among the US states for its fiscal 50th among the US states for its fiscal 50th among the US states for its fiscal health. In other words, it is the least health. In other words, it is the least health, in other words, it is the least fiscally healthy state in the Union and fiscally healthy state in the Union and fiscally healthy state in the Union and you just lost General Electric.
Lot's of you just lost General Electric, lot's of you just lost General Electric, lot's of luck folks, the US Department of luck folks, the US Department of luck folks, the US Department of Education which we're gonna cut very big Education which we're gonna cut very Big Education, which we're gonna cut, very big leave, we're gonna bring it all back, leave we're gonna bring it all back, leave we're gonna bring it all back locally.
We're gonna get rid of common locally. We're gonna get rid of common locally, we're gonna get rid of common core. The US Department of Education reports, the US Department of Education reports the US Department of Education reports. Connecticut is expected to have the Connecticut is expected to have the Connecticut is expected to have the nation's third fastest decline in nation's third fastest decline in nation's third fastest decline in students enrolled in high school.
Over students enrolled in high school, over students enrolled in high school over the next 10 years, it will probably be the next 10 years. It will probably be the next 10 years. It will probably be number one fairly soon. Congratulations number one fairly soon. Congratulations number one. Fairly soon, congratulations, people.
Hey, am I depressing everybody, people? Hey, am I depressing everybody, people? Hey, am I depressing? Everybody don't be depressed. You know when I made don't be depressed, you know when I made don't be depressed. You know when I made my convention speech and we did have my convention speech and we did have my convention speech and we did have four or five million more people than four or five million more people than four or five million more people than Hillary.
But that's okay, but when I made Hillary, but that's okay. But when I made Hillary, but that's okay. But when I made a lot of people, the critics, the critics, a lot of people, the critics, the critics, a lot of people, the critics, the critics, they said it was dark, it wasn't, it was - they said it was dark, it wasn't, it was - they said it Was dark, it wasn't - it was optimistic.
I was saying we have problems optimistic. I was saying we have problems optimistic. I was saying we have problems. We have problems with radical Islamic. We have problems with radical Islamic. We have problems with radical Islamic terrorism. We're going to solve them, we terrorism, we're going to solve them, we terrorism, we're going to solve them.
We have problems with education. We have have problems with education. We have have problems with education. We have problems with Second Amendment. They want problems with Second Amendment. They want problems with Second Amendment they want to - they want to dice up your Second to they want to dice up your Second to they want to dice up your Second Amendment.
They want to take your Amendment. They want to take your Amendment. They want to take your protection away, the National Rifle protection away, the National Rifle protection away, the National Rifle Association in probably, I think the Association in probably, I think the Association in probably, I think the earliest endorsement they've ever given earliest endorsement they've ever given earliest Endorsement, they've ever given endorsed Donald Trump.
We are going to endorsed Donald Trump. We are going to endorsed Donald Trump. We are going to save - we are going to save your second save. We are going to save your second save. We are going to save your second demand high. Connecticut is losing its demand high. Connecticut is losing its demand high. Connecticut is losing its younger population, high property taxes, younger population, high property taxes, younger population, high property taxes are hurting.
Family income and job loss are hurting family income and job loss are hurting family income and job loss is forcing people out of the state. State is forcing people out of the state. State is forcing people out of the state state. You can't move - you're not gonna move are - you can't move - you're not gonna move are you can't move - you're not gonna move, are you - you can't move - you can't move, don't you, you can't move - you can't move, don't you, you can't move - you can't Move, don't worry your house will be valuable again, worry your house will be valuable.
Again, worry your house will be valuable again, can't move, you can't sell your house, you can't move, you can't sell your house, you can't move, you can't sell your house, you can't move. Okay, I like that, you know, I'm can't move okay. I like that. You know I'm can't move, okay. I like that. You know, I'm gonna keep you here and then we're going gonna keep you here and then we're going gonna keep you here.
And then we're going to bring companies back, we're gonna to bring companies back, we're gonna to bring companies back. We're gonna bring jobs back and you're all gonna say bring jobs back and you're all gonna say bring jobs back and you're all gonna say. Thank You, mr. president. Thank You, mr. president.
Thank You, mr. president. Since our very incompetent president since our very incompetent president since our very incompetent president took office real, median household income took office real, median household income took office real. Median household income in Connecticut has decreased by one in Connecticut has decreased by one in Connecticut has decreased by one thousand dollars, great going Obama since thousand dollars, great going Obama since thousand dollars, great going Obama since 2008. The number of people in Connecticut 2008, the number of people in Connecticut 2008, the number of people in Connecticut living in poverty has nearly doubled.
One living in poverty has nearly doubled. One living in poverty has nearly doubled one in four african-americans in the state in four african-americans in the state in four african-americans in the state of Connecticut are now living in poverty of Connecticut are now living in poverty of Connecticut are now living in poverty.
Thank You. President Obama very much last year, big problem. This is why we're last year, big problem. This is why we're last year, big problem. This is why we're putting the wall up folks and this is putting the wall up folks and this is putting the wall up folks and this is why we're gonna be tough at the border, why we're gonna be tough at the border, why we're gon Na be tough at the border last year, heroin, right?
You know what last year heroin, right? You know what last year heroin, right? You know what we're gonna say last year heroin related, we're gonna say last year heroin related, we're gonna say last year heroin related deaths in Connecticut increased by 27 %, deaths in Connecticut increased by 27 %, deaths in Connecticut increased by 27 % deaths And fentanyl related deaths, deaths and fentanyl related deaths, deaths and fentanyl related deaths increased by 150 percent deaths according to a new study by the US. According to a new study by the US. According to a new study by the US Department of Justice, Mexico is the Department of Justice.
Mexico is the Department of Justice. Mexico is the primary supplier of heroin coming into primary supplier of heroin coming into primary supplier of heroin coming into the United States. Doesn't it just make the United States? Doesn't it just make the United States? Doesn't it just make you so angry you so angry you so angry really.
So we're gonna build it, don't really. So we're gonna build it, don't really. So we're gonna build it, don't worry, don't even think don't even think worry, don't even think don't even think worry, don't even think don't even think about. I have a good group over there about - I have a good group over there about - I have a good group over there.
They are serious wall. People don't even they are serious wall. People don't even they are serious wall people don't even think about. So I just want to tell you think about, so I just want to tell you think about. So I just want to tell you and we're gonna end on this, we're gonna and we're gonna end on this, we're gonna and we're gonna end on this.
We're gonna have strong borders, we're gonna build, have strong borders, we're gonna build, have strong borders, we're gonna build the wall, Mexico's gonna pay for the wall, the wall, Mexico's gonna pay for the wall, the wall, Mexico's gonna pay for The wall we're gonna stop people and by the way we're gonna stop people and by the way we're gonna stop people and by the way our Border Patrol agents are so amazing.
Our Border Patrol agents are so amazing. Our Border Patrol agents are so amazing. It would be very easy for them to say it would be very easy for them to say it would be very easy for them to say everything is perfect, everything is fine, everything is perfect, everything is fine, everything is perfect.
Everything is fine, come on, keep going through like we're come on, keep going through like we're come on, keep going through like we're Swiss cheese. But you know they're Swiss cheese, but you know they're Swiss cheese. But you know, they're amazing they want to do their job. Amazing, they want to do their job amazing.
They want to do their job. They're incredible. We will have strong - they're incredible. We will have strong - they're incredible. We will have strong borders. I'm gonna give an immigration borders, I'm gonna give an immigration borders, I'm gonna give an immigration speech. We're going to stop illegal speech.
We're going to stop illegal speech. We're going to stop illegal immigration. We're going to make a policy immigration. We're going to make a policy immigration. We're going to make a policy speech in two weeks and I think you're speech in two weeks and I think you're speech in two weeks and I think you're going to like it.
Thank you. But here's what's really happening. So - but here's what's really happening. So - but here's what's really happening. So we're gonna have our borders. We're - we're gonna have our borders, we're - we're gonna have our borders, we're getting rid of common core. We're getting - getting rid of common core.